Illinois, session 104th, HB4808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-12 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/14-12)7    Sec. 14-12. Hospital rate reform payment system. The 8hospital payment system pursuant to Section 14-11 of this 9Article shall be as follows:10    (a) Inpatient hospital services. Effective on and after 11the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly, reimbursement for inpatient general acute care 13services shall utilize the All Patient Refined Diagnosis 14Related Grouping (APR-DRG) software distributed by SolventumTM 15previously known as 3MTM Health Information System. SolventumTM 16shall be the exclusive provider of this software unless the 17Department determines that SolventumTM is unable to meet the 18required operational or contractual terms. Only under these 19circumstances may an alternative authorized provider of the 20software be considered. 21        (1) The Department shall establish Medicaid weighting 22    factors to be used in the reimbursement system established 23    under this subsection. Initial weighting factors shall be   HB4808 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    the weighting factors as published by the authorized 2    provider of this software adjusted for the Illinois 3    experience. 4        (2) The Department shall establish a 5    statewide-standardized amount to be used in the inpatient 6    reimbursement system. The Department shall publish these 7    amounts on its website no later than 10 calendar days 8    prior to their effective date. 9        (3) In addition to the statewide-standardized amount, 10    the Department shall develop adjusters to adjust the rate 11    of reimbursement for critical Medicaid providers or 12    services for trauma, transplantation services, perinatal 13    care, and Graduate Medical Education (GME). 14        (4) The Department shall develop add-on payments to 15    account for exceptionally costly inpatient stays, 16    consistent with Medicare outlier principles. Outlier fixed 17    loss thresholds may be updated to control for excessive 18    growth in outlier payments no more frequently than on an 19    annual basis, but at least once every 4 years. Upon 20    updating the fixed loss thresholds, the Department shall 21    be required to update base rates within 12 months.22        (5) The Department shall define those hospitals or 23    distinct parts of hospitals that shall be exempt from the 24    APR-DRG reimbursement system established under this 25    Section. The Department shall publish these hospitals' 26    inpatient rates on its website no later than 10 calendar   HB4808 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    days prior to their effective date. 2        (6) Beginning July 1, 2014 and ending on December 31, 3    2023, in addition to the statewide-standardized amount, 4    the Department shall develop an adjustor to adjust the 5    rate of reimbursement for safety-net hospitals defined in 6    Section 5-5e.1 of this Code excluding pediatric hospitals. 7        (7) Beginning July 1, 2014, in addition to the 8    statewide-standardized amount, the Department shall 9    develop an adjustor to adjust the rate of reimbursement 10    for Illinois freestanding inpatient psychiatric hospitals 11    that are not designated as children's hospitals by the 12    Department but are primarily treating patients under the 13    age of 21. 14        (7.5) (Blank).15        (8) Beginning July 1, 2018, in addition to the 16    statewide-standardized amount, the Department shall adjust 17    the rate of reimbursement for hospitals designated by the 18    Department of Public Health as a Perinatal Level II or II+ 19    center by applying the same adjustor that is applied to 20    Perinatal and Obstetrical care cases for Perinatal Level 21    III centers, as of December 31, 2017.22        (9) Beginning July 1, 2018, in addition to the 23    statewide-standardized amount, the Department shall apply 24    the same adjustor that is applied to trauma cases as of 25    December 31, 2017 to inpatient claims to treat patients 26    with burns, including, but not limited to, APR-DRGs 841,   HB4808 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    842, 843, and 844.2        (10) Beginning July 1, 2018, the 3    statewide-standardized amount for inpatient general acute 4    care services shall be uniformly increased so that base 5    claims projected reimbursement is increased by an amount 6    equal to the funds allocated in paragraph (1) of 7    subsection (b) of Section 5A-12.6, less the amount 8    allocated under paragraphs (8) and (9) of this subsection 9    and paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (b) multiplied by 10    40%.11        (11) Beginning July 1, 2018, the reimbursement for 12    inpatient rehabilitation services shall be increased by 13    the addition of a $96 per day add-on.14    (b) Outpatient hospital services. Effective on and after 15the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 16Assembly, reimbursement for outpatient services shall utilize 17the Enhanced Ambulatory Procedure Grouping (EAPG) software 18distributed by SolventumTM previously known as 3MTM Health 19Information System. SolventumTM shall be the exclusive 20provider of this software unless the Agency determines that 21SolventumTM is unable to meet the required operational or 22contractual terms. Only under these circumstances may an 23alternative authorized provider of the software be considered. 24        (1) The Department shall establish Medicaid weighting 25    factors to be used in the reimbursement system established 26    under this subsection. The initial weighting factors shall   HB4808 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    be the weighting factors as published by the authorized 2    provider. 3        (2) The Department shall establish service specific 4    statewide-standardized amounts to be used in the 5    reimbursement system. 6            (A) The initial statewide standardized amounts, 7        with the labor portion adjusted by the Calendar Year 8        2013 Medicare Outpatient Prospective Payment System 9        wage index with reclassifications, shall be published 10        by the Department on its website no later than 10 11        calendar days prior to their effective date. 12            (B) The Department shall establish adjustments to 13        the statewide-standardized amounts for each Critical 14        Access Hospital, as designated by the Department of 15        Public Health in accordance with 42 CFR 485, Subpart 16        F. For outpatient services provided on or before June 17        30, 2018, the EAPG standardized amounts are determined 18        separately for each critical access hospital such that 19        simulated EAPG payments using outpatient base period 20        paid claim data plus payments under Section 5A-12.4 of 21        this Code net of the associated tax costs are equal to 22        the estimated costs of outpatient base period claims 23        data with a rate year cost inflation factor applied. 24        (3) In addition to the statewide-standardized amounts, 25    the Department shall develop adjusters to adjust the rate 26    of reimbursement for critical Medicaid hospital outpatient   HB4808 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    providers or services, including outpatient high volume or 2    safety-net hospitals. Beginning July 1, 2018, the 3    outpatient high volume adjustor shall be increased to 4    increase annual expenditures associated with this adjustor 5    by $79,200,000, based on the State Fiscal Year 2015 base 6    year data and this adjustor shall apply to public 7    hospitals, except for large public hospitals, as defined 8    under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 148.25(a).9        (4) Beginning July 1, 2018, in addition to the 10    statewide standardized amounts, the Department shall make 11    an add-on payment for outpatient expensive devices and 12    drugs. This add-on payment shall at least apply to claim 13    lines that: (i) are assigned with one of the following 14    EAPGs: 490, 1001 to 1020, and coded with one of the 15    following revenue codes: 0274 to 0276, 0278; or (ii) are 16    assigned with one of the following EAPGs: 430 to 441, 443, 17    444, 460 to 465, 495, 496, 1090. The add-on payment shall 18    be calculated as follows: the claim line's covered charges 19    multiplied by the hospital's total acute cost to charge 20    ratio, less the claim line's EAPG payment plus $1,000, 21    multiplied by 0.8.22        (5) Beginning July 1, 2018, the statewide-standardized 23    amounts for outpatient services shall be increased by a 24    uniform percentage so that base claims projected 25    reimbursement is increased by an amount equal to no less 26    than the funds allocated in paragraph (1) of subsection   HB4808 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    (b) of Section 5A-12.6, less the amount allocated under 2    paragraphs (8) and (9) of subsection (a) and paragraphs 3    (3) and (4) of this subsection multiplied by 46%. 4        (6) Effective for dates of service on or after July 1, 5    2018, the Department shall establish adjustments to the 6    statewide-standardized amounts for each Critical Access 7    Hospital, as designated by the Department of Public Health 8    in accordance with 42 CFR 485, Subpart F, such that each 9    Critical Access Hospital's standardized amount for 10    outpatient services shall be increased by the applicable 11    uniform percentage determined pursuant to paragraph (5) of 12    this subsection. It is the intent of the General Assembly 13    that the adjustments required under this paragraph (6) by 14    Public Act 100-1181 shall be applied retroactively to 15    claims for dates of service provided on or after July 1, 16    2018. 17        (7) Effective for dates of service on or after March 18    8, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1181), the 19    Department shall recalculate and implement an updated 20    statewide-standardized amount for outpatient services 21    provided by hospitals that are not Critical Access 22    Hospitals to reflect the applicable uniform percentage 23    determined pursuant to paragraph (5). 24            (1) Any recalculation to the 25        statewide-standardized amounts for outpatient services 26        provided by hospitals that are not Critical Access   HB4808 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        Hospitals shall be the amount necessary to achieve the 2        increase in the statewide-standardized amounts for 3        outpatient services increased by a uniform percentage, 4        so that base claims projected reimbursement is 5        increased by an amount equal to no less than the funds 6        allocated in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of 7        Section 5A-12.6, less the amount allocated under 8        paragraphs (8) and (9) of subsection (a) and 9        paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, for all 10        hospitals that are not Critical Access Hospitals, 11        multiplied by 46%.12            (2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that 13        the recalculations required under this paragraph (7) 14        by Public Act 100-1181 shall be applied prospectively 15        to claims for dates of service provided on or after 16        March 8, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 17        100-1181) and that no recoupment or repayment by the 18        Department or an MCO of payments attributable to 19        recalculation under this paragraph (7), issued to the 20        hospital for dates of service on or after July 1, 2018 21        and before March 8, 2019 (the effective date of Public 22        Act 100-1181), shall be permitted. 23        (8) The Department shall ensure that all necessary 24    adjustments to the managed care organization capitation 25    base rates necessitated by the adjustments under 26    subparagraph (6) or (7) of this subsection are completed   HB4808 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    and applied retroactively in accordance with Section 2    5-30.8 of this Code within 90 days of March 8, 2019 (the 3    effective date of Public Act 100-1181). 4        (9) Within 60 days after federal approval of the 5    change made to the assessment in Section 5A-2 by Public 6    Act 101-650, the Department shall incorporate into the 7    EAPG system for outpatient services those services 8    performed by hospitals currently billed through the 9    Non-Institutional Provider billing system. 10    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 11beginning with dates of service on and after January 1, 2023, 12any general acute care hospital with more than 500 outpatient 13psychiatric Medicaid services to persons under 19 years of age 14in any calendar year shall be paid the outpatient add-on 15payment of no less than $113. 16    (c) In consultation with the hospital community, the 17Department is authorized to replace 89 Ill. Adm. Code 152.150 18as published in 38 Ill. Reg. 4980 through 4986 within 12 months 19of June 16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-651). If 20the Department does not replace these rules within 12 months 21of June 16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-651), the 22rules in effect for 152.150 as published in 38 Ill. Reg. 4980 23through 4986 shall remain in effect until modified by rule by 24the Department. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed 25to mandate that the Department file a replacement rule. 26    (d) Transition period. There shall be a transition period   HB4808 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1to the reimbursement systems authorized under this Section 2that shall begin on the effective date of these systems and 3continue until June 30, 2018, unless extended by rule by the 4Department. To help provide an orderly and predictable 5transition to the new reimbursement systems and to preserve 6and enhance access to the hospital services during this 7transition, the Department shall allocate a transitional 8hospital access pool of at least $290,000,000 annually so that 9transitional hospital access payments are made to hospitals. 10        (1) After the transition period, the Department may 11    begin incorporating the transitional hospital access pool 12    into the base rate structure; however, the transitional 13    hospital access payments in effect on June 30, 2018 shall 14    continue to be paid, if continued under Section 5A-16. 15        (2) After the transition period, if the Department 16    reduces payments from the transitional hospital access 17    pool, it shall increase base rates, develop new adjustors, 18    adjust current adjustors, develop new hospital access 19    payments based on updated information, or any combination 20    thereof by an amount equal to the decreases proposed in 21    the transitional hospital access pool payments, ensuring 22    that the entire transitional hospital access pool amount 23    shall continue to be used for hospital payments. 24    (d-5) Hospital and health care transformation program. The 25Department shall develop a hospital and health care 26transformation program to provide financial assistance to   HB4808 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1hospitals in transforming their services and care models to 2better align with the needs of the communities they serve. The 3payments authorized in this Section shall be subject to 4approval by the federal government.5        (1) Phase 1. In State fiscal years 2019 through 2020, 6    the Department shall allocate funds from the transitional 7    access hospital pool to create a hospital transformation 8    pool of at least $262,906,870 annually and make hospital 9    transformation payments to hospitals. Subject to Section 10    5A-16, in State fiscal years 2019 and 2020, an Illinois 11    hospital that received either a transitional hospital 12    access payment under subsection (d) or a supplemental 13    payment under subsection (f) of this Section in State 14    fiscal year 2018, shall receive a hospital transformation 15    payment as follows:16            (A) If the hospital's Rate Year 2017 Medicaid 17        inpatient utilization rate is equal to or greater than 18        45%, the hospital transformation payment shall be 19        equal to 100% of the sum of its transitional hospital 20        access payment authorized under subsection (d) and any 21        supplemental payment authorized under subsection (f).22            (B) If the hospital's Rate Year 2017 Medicaid 23        inpatient utilization rate is equal to or greater than 24        25% but less than 45%, the hospital transformation 25        payment shall be equal to 75% of the sum of its 26        transitional hospital access payment authorized under   HB4808 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        subsection (d) and any supplemental payment authorized 2        under subsection (f).3            (C) If the hospital's Rate Year 2017 Medicaid 4        inpatient utilization rate is less than 25%, the 5        hospital transformation payment shall be equal to 50% 6        of the sum of its transitional hospital access payment 7        authorized under subsection (d) and any supplemental 8        payment authorized under subsection (f).9        (2) Phase 2. 10            (A) The funding amount from phase one shall be 11        incorporated into directed payment and pass-through 12        payment methodologies described in Section 5A-12.7.13            (B) Because there are communities in Illinois that 14        experience significant health care disparities due to 15        systemic racism, as recently emphasized by the 16        COVID-19 pandemic, aggravated by social determinants 17        of health and a lack of sufficiently allocated health 18        care resources, particularly community-based services, 19        preventive care, obstetric care, chronic disease 20        management, and specialty care, the Department shall 21        establish a health care transformation program that 22        shall be supported by the transformation funding pool. 23        It is the intention of the General Assembly that 24        innovative partnerships funded by the pool must be 25        designed to establish or improve integrated health 26        care delivery systems that will provide significant   HB4808 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        access to the Medicaid and uninsured populations in 2        their communities, as well as improve health care 3        equity. It is also the intention of the General 4        Assembly that partnerships recognize and address the 5        disparities revealed by the COVID-19 pandemic, as well 6        as the need for post-COVID care. During State fiscal 7        years 2021 through 2027, the hospital and health care 8        transformation program shall be supported by an annual 9        transformation funding pool of up to $150,000,000, 10        pending federal matching funds, to be allocated during 11        the specified fiscal years for the purpose of 12        facilitating hospital and health care transformation. 13        Funds that had been budgeted but unexpended in State 14        fiscal years 2021 through 2027 may be allocated in 15        State fiscal year 2028 in an amount not to exceed 16        $150,000,000. No disbursement of moneys for 17        transformation projects from the transformation 18        funding pool described under this Section shall be 19        considered an award, a grant, or an expenditure of 20        grant funds. Funding agreements made in accordance 21        with the transformation program shall be considered 22        purchases of care under the Illinois Procurement Code, 23        and funds shall be expended by the Department in a 24        manner that maximizes federal funding to expend the 25        entire allocated amount.26            The Department shall convene, within 30 days after   HB4808 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        March 12, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 2        101-655), a workgroup that includes subject matter 3        experts on health care disparities and stakeholders 4        from distressed communities, which could be a 5        subcommittee of the Medicaid Advisory Committee, to 6        review and provide recommendations on how Department 7        policy, including health care transformation, can 8        improve health disparities and the impact on 9        communities disproportionately affected by COVID-19. 10        The workgroup shall consider and make recommendations 11        on the following issues: a community safety-net 12        designation of certain hospitals, racial equity, and a 13        regional partnership to bring additional specialty 14        services to communities. 15            (C) As provided in paragraph (9) of Section 3 of 16        the Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act, any 17        hospital participating in the transformation program 18        may be excluded from the requirements of the Illinois 19        Health Facilities Planning Act for those projects 20        related to the hospital's transformation. To be 21        eligible, the hospital must submit to the Health 22        Facilities and Services Review Board approval from the 23        Department that the project is a part of the 24        hospital's transformation.25            (D) As provided in subsection (a-20) of Section 26        32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems   HB4808 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        Act, a hospital that received hospital transformation 2        payments under this Section may convert to a 3        freestanding emergency center. To be eligible for such 4        a conversion, the hospital must submit to the 5        Department of Public Health approval from the 6        Department that the project is a part of the 7        hospital's transformation.8            (E) Criteria for proposals. To be eligible for 9        funding under this Section, a transformation proposal 10        shall meet all of the following criteria: 11                (i) the proposal shall be designed based on 12            community needs assessment completed by either a 13            University partner or other qualified entity with 14            significant community input;15                (ii) the proposal shall be a collaboration 16            among providers across the care and community 17            spectrum, including preventative care, primary 18            care specialty care, hospital services, mental 19            health and substance abuse services, as well as 20            community-based entities that address the social 21            determinants of health;22                (iii) the proposal shall be specifically 23            designed to improve health care outcomes and 24            reduce health care disparities, and improve the 25            coordination, effectiveness, and efficiency of 26            care delivery;  HB4808 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1                (iv) the proposal shall have specific 2            measurable metrics related to disparities that 3            will be tracked by the Department and made public 4            by the Department;5                (v) the proposal shall include a commitment to 6            include Business Enterprise Program certified 7            vendors or other entities controlled and managed 8            by minorities or women; and 9                (vi) the proposal shall specifically increase 10            access to primary, preventive, or specialty care. 11            (F) Entities eligible to be funded. 12                (i) Proposals for funding should come from 13            collaborations operating in one of the most 14            distressed communities in Illinois as determined 15            by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and 16            Prevention's Social Vulnerability Index for 17            Illinois and areas disproportionately impacted by 18            COVID-19 or from rural areas of Illinois.19                (ii) The Department shall prioritize 20            partnerships from distressed communities, which 21            include Business Enterprise Program certified 22            vendors or other entities controlled and managed 23            by minorities or women and also include one or 24            more of the following: safety-net hospitals, 25            critical access hospitals, the campuses of 26            hospitals that have closed since January 1, 2018,   HB4808 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1            or other health care providers designed to address 2            specific health care disparities, including the 3            impact of COVID-19 on individuals and the 4            community and the need for post-COVID care. All 5            funded proposals must include specific measurable 6            goals and metrics related to improved outcomes and 7            reduced disparities which shall be tracked by the 8            Department.9                (iii) The Department should target the funding 10            in the following ways: $30,000,000 of 11            transformation funds to projects that are a 12            collaboration between a safety-net hospital, 13            particularly community safety-net hospitals, and 14            other providers and designed to address specific 15            health care disparities, $20,000,000 of 16            transformation funds to collaborations between 17            safety-net hospitals and a larger hospital partner 18            that increases specialty care in distressed 19            communities, $30,000,000 of transformation funds 20            to projects that are a collaboration between 21            hospitals and other providers in distressed areas 22            of the State designed to address specific health 23            care disparities, $15,000,000 to collaborations 24            between critical access hospitals and other 25            providers designed to address specific health care 26            disparities, and $15,000,000 to cross-provider   HB4808 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1            collaborations designed to address specific health 2            care disparities, and $5,000,000 to collaborations 3            that focus on workforce development. 4                (iv) The Department may allocate up to 5            $5,000,000 for planning, racial equity analysis, 6            or consulting resources for the Department or 7            entities without the resources to develop a plan 8            to meet the criteria of this Section. Any contract 9            for consulting services issued by the Department 10            under this subparagraph shall comply with the 11            provisions of Section 5-45 of the State Officials 12            and Employees Ethics Act. Based on availability of 13            federal funding, the Department may directly 14            procure consulting services or provide funding to 15            the collaboration. The provision of resources 16            under this subparagraph is not a guarantee that a 17            project will be approved. 18                (v) The Department shall take steps to ensure 19            that safety-net hospitals operating in 20            under-resourced communities receive priority 21            access to hospital and health care transformation 22            funds, including consulting funds, as provided 23            under this Section. 24            (G) Process for submitting and approving projects 25        for distressed communities. The Department shall issue 26        a template for application. The Department shall post   HB4808 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        any proposal received on the Department's website for 2        at least 2 weeks for public comment, and any such 3        public comment shall also be considered in the review 4        process. Applicants may request that proprietary 5        financial information be redacted from publicly posted 6        proposals and the Department in its discretion may 7        agree. Proposals for each distressed community must 8        include all of the following: 9                (i) A detailed description of how the project 10            intends to affect the goals outlined in this 11            subsection, describing new interventions, new 12            technology, new structures, and other changes to 13            the health care delivery system planned.14                (ii) A detailed description of the racial and 15            ethnic makeup of the entities' board and 16            leadership positions and the salaries of the 17            executive staff of entities in the partnership 18            that is seeking to obtain funding under this 19            Section. 20                (iii) A complete budget, including an overall 21            timeline and a detailed pathway to sustainability 22            within a 5-year period, specifying other sources 23            of funding, such as in-kind, cost-sharing, or 24            private donations, particularly for capital needs. 25            There is an expectation that parties to the 26            transformation project dedicate resources to the   HB4808 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1            extent they are able and that these expectations 2            are delineated separately for each entity in the 3            proposal.4                (iv) A description of any new entities formed 5            or other legal relationships between collaborating 6            entities and how funds will be allocated among 7            participants. 8                (v) A timeline showing the evolution of sites 9            and specific services of the project over a 5-year 10            period, including services available to the 11            community by site.12                (vi) Clear milestones indicating progress 13            toward the proposed goals of the proposal as 14            checkpoints along the way to continue receiving 15            funding. The Department is authorized to refine 16            these milestones in agreements, and is authorized 17            to impose reasonable penalties, including 18            repayment of funds, for substantial lack of 19            progress.20                (vii) A clear statement of the level of 21            commitment the project will include for minorities 22            and women in contracting opportunities, including 23            as equity partners where applicable, or as 24            subcontractors and suppliers in all phases of the 25            project.26                (viii) If the community study utilized is not   HB4808 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1            the study commissioned and published by the 2            Department, the applicant must define the 3            methodology used, including documentation of clear 4            community participation.5                (ix) A description of the process used in 6            collaborating with all levels of government in the 7            community served in the development of the 8            project, including, but not limited to, 9            legislators and officials of other units of local 10            government.11                (x) Documentation of a community input process 12            in the community served, including links to 13            proposal materials on public websites.14                (xi) Verifiable project milestones and quality 15            metrics that will be impacted by transformation. 16            These project milestones and quality metrics must 17            be identified with improvement targets that must 18            be met.19                (xii) Data on the number of existing employees 20            by various job categories and wage levels by the 21            zip code of the employees' residence and 22            benchmarks for the continued maintenance and 23            improvement of these levels. The proposal must 24            also describe any retraining or other workforce 25            development planned for the new project.26                (xiii) If a new entity is created by the   HB4808 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1            project, a description of how the board will be 2            reflective of the community served by the 3            proposal. 4                (xiv) An explanation of how the proposal will 5            address the existing disparities that exacerbated 6            the impact of COVID-19 and the need for post-COVID 7            care in the community, if applicable. 8                (xv) An explanation of how the proposal is 9            designed to increase access to care, including 10            specialty care based upon the community's needs. 11            (H) The Department shall evaluate proposals for 12        compliance with the criteria listed under subparagraph 13        (G). Proposals meeting all of the criteria may be 14        eligible for funding with the areas of focus 15        prioritized as described in item (ii) of subparagraph 16        (F). Based on the funds available, the Department may 17        negotiate funding agreements with approved applicants 18        to maximize federal funding. Nothing in this 19        subsection requires that an approved project be funded 20        to the level requested. Agreements shall specify the 21        amount of funding anticipated annually, the 22        methodology of payments, the limit on the number of 23        years such funding may be provided, and the milestones 24        and quality metrics that must be met by the projects in 25        order to continue to receive funding during each year 26        of the program. Agreements shall specify the terms and   HB4808 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        conditions under which a health care facility that 2        receives funds under a purchase of care agreement and 3        closes in violation of the terms of the agreement must 4        pay an early closure fee no greater than 50% of the 5        funds it received under the agreement, prior to the 6        Health Facilities and Services Review Board 7        considering an application for closure of the 8        facility. Any project that is funded shall be required 9        to provide quarterly written progress reports, in a 10        form prescribed by the Department, and at a minimum 11        shall include the progress made in achieving any 12        milestones or metrics or Business Enterprise Program 13        commitments in its plan. The Department may reduce or 14        end payments, as set forth in transformation plans, if 15        milestones or metrics or Business Enterprise Program 16        commitments are not achieved. The Department shall 17        seek to make payments from the transformation fund in 18        a manner that is eligible for federal matching funds. 19            In reviewing the proposals, the Department shall 20        take into account the needs of the community, data 21        from the study commissioned by the Department from the 22        University of Illinois-Chicago if applicable, feedback 23        from public comment on the Department's website, as 24        well as how the proposal meets the criteria listed 25        under subparagraph (G). Alignment with the 26        Department's overall strategic initiatives shall be an   HB4808 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1        important factor. To the extent that fiscal year 2        funding is not adequate to fund all eligible projects 3        that apply, the Department shall prioritize 4        applications that most comprehensively and effectively 5        address the criteria listed under subparagraph (G). 6        (3) (Blank).7        (4) Hospital Transformation Review Committee. There is 8    created the Hospital Transformation Review Committee. The 9    Committee shall consist of 14 members. No later than 30 10    days after March 12, 2018 (the effective date of Public 11    Act 100-581), the 4 legislative leaders shall each appoint 12    3 members; the Governor shall appoint the Director of 13    Healthcare and Family Services, or his or her designee, as 14    a member; and the Director of Healthcare and Family 15    Services shall appoint one member. Any vacancy shall be 16    filled by the applicable appointing authority within 15 17    calendar days. The members of the Committee shall select a 18    Chair and a Vice-Chair from among its members, provided 19    that the Chair and Vice-Chair cannot be appointed by the 20    same appointing authority and must be from different 21    political parties. The Chair shall have the authority to 22    establish a meeting schedule and convene meetings of the 23    Committee, and the Vice-Chair shall have the authority to 24    convene meetings in the absence of the Chair. The 25    Committee may establish its own rules with respect to 26    meeting schedule, notice of meetings, and the disclosure   HB4808 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    of documents; however, the Committee shall not have the 2    power to subpoena individuals or documents and any rules 3    must be approved by 9 of the 14 members. The Committee 4    shall perform the functions described in this Section and 5    advise and consult with the Director in the administration 6    of this Section. In addition to reviewing and approving 7    the policies, procedures, and rules for the hospital and 8    health care transformation program, the Committee shall 9    consider and make recommendations related to qualifying 10    criteria and payment methodologies related to safety-net 11    hospitals and children's hospitals. Members of the 12    Committee appointed by the legislative leaders shall be 13    subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics 14    Commission, not the Executive Ethics Commission, and all 15    requests under the Freedom of Information Act shall be 16    directed to the applicable Freedom of Information officer 17    for the General Assembly. The Department shall provide 18    operational support to the Committee as necessary. The 19    Committee is dissolved on April 1, 2019. 20    (e) Beginning 36 months after initial implementation, the 21Department shall update the reimbursement components in 22subsections (a) and (b), including standardized amounts and 23weighting factors, and at least once every 4 years and no more 24frequently than annually thereafter. The Department shall 25publish these updates on its website no later than 30 calendar 26days prior to their effective date.   HB4808 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1    (f) Continuation of supplemental payments. Any 2supplemental payments authorized under 89 Illinois 3Administrative Code 148 effective January 1, 2014 and that 4continue during the period of July 1, 2014 through December 531, 2014 shall remain in effect as long as the assessment 6imposed by Section 5A-2 that is in effect on December 31, 2017 7remains in effect. 8    (g) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (f) of this 9Section and notwithstanding the changes authorized under 10Section 5-5b.1, any updates to the system shall not result in 11any diminishment of the overall effective rates of 12reimbursement as of the implementation date of the new system 13(July 1, 2014). These updates shall not preclude variations in 14any individual component of the system or hospital rate 15variations. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 16Department from increasing the rates of reimbursement or 17developing payments to ensure access to hospital services. 18Nothing in this Section shall be construed to guarantee a 19minimum amount of spending in the aggregate or per hospital as 20spending may be impacted by factors, including, but not 21limited to, the number of individuals in the medical 22assistance program and the severity of illness of the 23individuals.24    (h) The Department shall have the authority to modify by 25rulemaking any changes to the rates or methodologies in this 26Section as required by the federal government to obtain   HB4808 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1federal financial participation for expenditures made under 2this Section. 3    (i) Except for subsections (g) and (h) of this Section, 4the Department shall, pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 55-40 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, provide for 6presentation at the June 2014 hearing of the Joint Committee 7on Administrative Rules (JCAR) additional written notice to 8JCAR of the following rules in order to commence the second 9notice period for the following rules: rules published in the 10Illinois Register, rule dated February 21, 2014 at 38 Ill. 11Reg. 4559 (Medical Payment), 4628 (Specialized Health Care 12Delivery Systems), 4640 (Hospital Services), 4932 (Diagnostic 13Related Grouping (DRG) Prospective Payment System (PPS)), and 144977 (Hospital Reimbursement Changes), and published in the 15Illinois Register dated March 21, 2014 at 38 Ill. Reg. 6499 16(Specialized Health Care Delivery Systems) and 6505 (Hospital 17Services).18    (j) Out-of-state hospitals. Beginning July 1, 2018, for 19purposes of determining for State fiscal years 2019 and 2020 20and subsequent fiscal years the hospitals eligible for the 21payments authorized under subsections (a) and (b) of this 22Section, the Department shall include out-of-state hospitals 23that are designated a Level I pediatric trauma center or a 24Level I trauma center by the Department of Public Health as of 25December 1, 2017.26    (k) The Department shall notify each hospital and managed   HB4808 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 19092 KTG 32537 b1care organization, in writing, of the impact of the updates 2under this Section at least 30 calendar days prior to their 3effective date. 4    (l) This Section is subject to Section 14-12.5. 5(Source: P.A. 103-102, eff. 6-16-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 6104-9, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)